District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-804

Security interest unperfected before applicability date.

A security interest that is an unperfected security interest immediately before the applicability date becomes a perfected security interest:

(1)

Without further action, on the applicability date, if the applicable requirements for perfection under Article 9 as amended by the 2012 Act are satisfied before or at that time; or

(2)

When the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-302, § 2(s), 60 DCR 2688
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-302: Section 4 of D.C. Law 19-302 provided that the act shall apply as of July 1, 2013.